Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.04.070

Who amenable to criminal statutes.

Every person, regardless of whether or not he or she is an inhabitant of this state, may be tried and punished under the laws of this state for an offense committed by him or her therein, except when such offense is cognizable exclusively in the courts of the United States.

[ 2011 c 336 s 348; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.04.070.]